apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="slø/ye__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gd</l>        <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yd</l>        <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yet</l>       <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gd</l>        <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yd</l>        <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yet</l>       <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gde</l>       <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>yet</l>       <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yde</l>       <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yede</l>      <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yete</l>      <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gde</l>       <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yde</l>       <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yede</l>      <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yete</l>      <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yende</l>     <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ye</l>        <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yes</l>       <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gd</l>        <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ya</l>        <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yd</l>        <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yet</l>       <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yer</l>       <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yes</l>       <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gde</l>       <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ya</l>        <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yde</l>       <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yet</l>       <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ya</l>        <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ya</l>        <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ya</l>        <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ya</l>        <r>ye<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ying</l>         <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>yer</l>         <r>ye<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="v/eve__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>evd</l>         <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l>         <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evet</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evd</l>         <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l>         <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evet</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evde</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evede</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evete</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>evd</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evde</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evede</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evete</l>        <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evende</l>      <r>eve<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ev</l>        <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eve</l>       <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eves</l>      <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evd</l>       <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l>       <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evet</l>      <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ever</l>      <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eves</l>      <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evde</l>      <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l>       <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evet</l>      <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ov</l>        <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>eving</l>        <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ever</l>        <r>eve<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="sløye"><i>slø</i><par n="slø/ye__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="veve"><i>v</i><par n="v/eve__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="høstpløye">	<i>høstplø</i>	<par n="slø/ye__vblex_adj"/> </e>
